fi: Rengaskumin tyyppi: Sisärenkaallinen (TT); Tubeless (TL); Tubeless-ready; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta zračnice za gume: Sa zračnicom (TT); Bez zračnice (TL); Spremno za upotrebu bez zračnice; Ostalo
en: Tire tube type: Tube type (TT); Tubeless (TL); Tubeless-ready; Other
pl: Typ dętki: Dętkowa (TT); Bezdętkowa (TL); Gotowa do systemu bezdętkowego (tubeless-ready); Inny
ja: タイヤチューブタイプ: チューブタイプ (TT); チューブレス (TL); チューブレスレディ; その他
ko: 타이어 튜브 유형: 튜브 타입(TT); 튜블리스(TL); 튜블리스 레디; 기타
es: Tipo de cámara del neumático: Con cámara (TT); Sin cámara (TL); Tubeless-ready; Otro
fr: Type de chambre à air du pneu: À chambre à air (TT); Tubeless (TL); Tubeless ready; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta zračnice za pnevmatiko: Z zračnico (TT); Brez zračnice (TL); Tubeless-ready; Drugo
hu: Gumiabroncs tömlőtípusa: Tömlős (TT); Tömlő nélküli (TL); Tubeless-ready; Egyéb
it: Tipo di camera d'aria: Con camera d'aria (TT); Tubeless (TL); Tubeless-ready; Altro
pt-BR: Pneu tipo de câmara: Com câmara (TT); Sem câmara (TL); Tubeless-ready; Outros
zh-CN: 轮胎内胎类型: 有内胎（TT）; 无内胎（TL）; 准真空胎; 其他
de: Reifenschlauchtyp: Mit Schlauch (TT); Schlauchlos (TL); Tubeless-Ready; Sonstige
nb: Dekkslangetype: Med slange (TT); Slangeløs (TL); Klar for slangeløs; Annet
nl: Bandtype: Met binnenband (TT); Tubeless (TL); Tubeless-ready; Overige
pt-PT: Tipo de câmara de ar do pneu: Com câmara de ar (TT); Sem câmara de ar (TL); Preparado para tubeless; Outro
sv: Däckslangtyp: Med slang (TT); Slanglöst (TL); Tubeless-ready; Övrigt
ru: Тип камеры шины: Камерная (TT); Бескамерная (TL); Готова к бескамерному использованию; Другое
cs: Typ duše pneumatiky: Dušové (TT); Bezdušové (TL); Tubeless-ready; Jiné
da: Dækslangetype: Med slange (TT); Tubeless (TL); Tubeless-ready; Andet
tr: Lastik iç lastik tipi: İç lastikli (TT); Tubeless (TL); Tubeless uyumlu; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de anvelopă: Cu cameră (TT); Tubeless (TL); Tubeless-ready; Altele
el: Τύπος αεροθαλάμου ελαστικού: Με σαμπρέλα (TT); Χωρίς σαμπρέλα (TL); Tubeless-ready; Άλλο
lt-LT: Padangos tipas pagal kamerą: Kamerinė (TT); Bekamerinė (TL); Pritaikyta bekamerinei; Kita
bg-BG: Тип вътрешна гума: Камерна (TT); Безкамерна (TL); Tubeless-ready; Друго
sk-SK: Typ duše pneumatiky: S dušou (TT); Bezdušové (TL); Pripravené na bezdušové použitie; Iné
zh-TW: 輪胎內胎類型: 內胎式 (TT); 無內胎 (TL); 支援無內胎; 其他
vi: Loại săm lốp: Loại có săm (TT); Không săm (TL); Sẵn sàng cho lốp không săm; Khác
th: ยางในชนิดยางใน: แบบมียางใน (TT); แบบไม่มียางใน (TL); รองรับการใช้แบบไม่มียางใน; อื่นๆ